District of Columbia statutes.
26-1401.26

Authority of conservator to borrow money; purpose.

(a)

With the prior approval of the Commissioner, the conservator of a universal bank may borrow money to aid in the operation, reorganization, or liquidation of the bank, including the payment of liquidating dividends.

(b)

With the prior approval of the Commissioner, the conservator may secure money borrowed under subsection (a) of this section by the pledge, hypothecation, or mortgage of the assets of the universal bank.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 226, 48 DCR 3244